apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="kla/ła__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ła</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łã</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łōm</l>       <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ło</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łōw</l>       <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łōm</l>       <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łami</l>      <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łach</l>      <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ceg/ła__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ła</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łã</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łōm</l>       <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ło</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eł</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łōm</l>       <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łami</l>      <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łach</l>      <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r>ła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="szk/oła__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oła</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ole</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołã</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołōm</l>      <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ole</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oło</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōł</l>        <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołōm</l>      <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołami</l>     <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ołach</l>     <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oły</l>       <r>oła<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Wi/sła__np">
  <e>       <p><l>sła</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śle</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słã</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słōm</l>      <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śle</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sło</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słōw</l>      <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słōm</l>      <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słami</l>     <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>słach</l>     <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sły</l>       <r>sła<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="iści/zna__n">
  <e>       <p><l>zna</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zny</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źnie</l>      <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>znã</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>znōm</l>      <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źnie</l>      <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zno</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>zny</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zn</l>        <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>znōm</l>      <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zny</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>znami</l>     <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>znach</l>     <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zny</l>       <r>zna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bajtała">         <i>bajta</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="banszoła">        <i>banszo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="baryła">          <i>bary</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bebła">           <i>beb</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bebuła">          <i>bebu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bedła">           <i>bed</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekuła">          <i>beku</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="berła">           <i>ber</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bereła">          <i>bere</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bimbała">         <i>bimba</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="blezeruła">       <i>blezeru</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bragoła">         <i>brago</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bratruła">        <i>bratru</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="brōnkała">        <i>brōnka</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="buła">            <i>bu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="buczoła">         <i>buczo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="błōnckała">       <i>błōncka</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bōmbeła">         <i>bōmbe</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="bōnckała">        <i>bōncka</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="ceduła">          <i>cedu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chachuła">        <i>chachu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chałapała">       <i>chałapa</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chebła">          <i>cheb</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chrztuła">        <i>chrztu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chwoła">          <i>chwo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="chyła">           <i>chy</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="damfuła">         <i>damfu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="deptała">         <i>depta</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="drzimoła">        <i>drzimo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="erbowizna">       <i>erbowi</i><par n="iści/zna__n"/></e>
<e lm="fafloła">         <i>faflo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="fafuła">          <i>fafu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="fifała">          <i>fifa</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="fijoła">          <i>fijo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="formuła">         <i>formu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="fuła">            <i>fu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="gorzoła">         <i>gorzo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="gramuła">         <i>gramu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="gryncbuła">       <i>gryncbu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="guguła">          <i>gugu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="haduła">          <i>hadu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="halbszuła">       <i>halbszu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="handszuła">       <i>handszu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="hałapała">        <i>hałapa</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="hyła">            <i>hy</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="imioła">          <i>imio</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="iścizna">         <i>iści</i><par n="iści/zna__n"/></e>
<e lm="jedła">           <i>jed</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="jegła">           <i>jeg</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="juła">            <i>ju</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiła">            <i>ki</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="klała">           <i>kla</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="kwała">           <i>kwa</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="lakszuła">        <i>lakszu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="majuskuła">       <i>majusku</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="mgła">            <i>mg</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="mietła">          <i>miet</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="mogiła">          <i>mogi</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="muła">            <i>mu</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="piła">            <i>pi</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="pierdoła">        <i>pierdo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="plała">           <i>pla</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="ruła">            <i>ru</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="rykała">          <i>ryka</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="sirchoła">        <i>sircho</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="sirzchoła">       <i>sirzcho</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="skoła">           <i>sko</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="szkoła">          <i>szk</i><par n="szk/oła__n"/></e>
<e lm="sznupała">        <i>sznupa</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="słabizna">        <i>słabi</i><par n="iści/zna__n"/></e>
<e lm="tintała">         <i>tinta</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="truwła">          <i>truw</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="trōchła">         <i>trōch</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="tuberkuła">       <i>tuberku</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="pochwoła">        <i>pochwo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="zoła">            <i>zo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôjczyzna">        <i>ôjczy</i><par n="iści/zna__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôptikruła">       <i>ôptikru</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="ōła">             <i>ō</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="Wisła">           <i>Wi</i><par n="Wi/sła__np"/></e>
<e lm="cegła">           <i>ceg</i><par n="ceg/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="smoła">           <i>smo</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
<e lm="pszczoła">        <i>pszcz</i><par n="szk/oła__n"/></e>
<e lm="pierdoła">        <i>pierd</i><par n="szk/oła__n"/></e>
<e lm="molekuła">        <i>moleku</i><par n="kla/ła__n"/></e>
